Utah statutes.
57-12-11.   Payments not income or resources for welfare or tax purposes.

No payment received by a displaced person under this act shall be considered as income or resources for the purpose of determining the eligibility or extent of eligibility of any person for assistance under any state law or for the purposes of the state's individual income tax, corporation franchise tax, or other tax laws. These payments shall not be considered as income or resources of any recipient of public assistance, and such payments shall not be deducted from the amount of aid to which the recipient would otherwise be entitled.



Enacted by Chapter 24, 1972 General Session

